District of Columbia statutes.
50-1208

Assignment of lien; form and requirement of assignment; entry and recording of assignment; certificate to holder of first lien.

The rights of the holder of an unsatisfied lien shown on a certificate may be assigned by an assignment in writing, which shall show the name and address of the assignee, the trade name and engine, serial or identification number of the motor vehicle, or the trade name and serial number, if any, of the trailer, and the Recorder’s record number of the instrument, or if none, a brief description sufficient to identify the lien shall be signed by the holder of the lien. Upon presentation of an assignment and a certificate and the payment of the prescribed fee, the Recorder shall enter upon the face of the certificate and upon the card hereinbefore described the Recorder’s record number of the lien which is being assigned, or, if no such instrument is on file, a brief description sufficient to identify the lien, the date of the assignment and the words, “Assigned to,” and the name and address of the assignee, and the date. The assignment shall be attached to the instrument if the instrument has been filed with the Recorder, and, if not, the assignment shall be given a Recorder’s record number and filed by the Recorder and such number shall be entered on the certificate and in the Department’s records. The certificate shall be delivered to the record holder of the 1st unsatisfied lien shown thereon, or his representative.

History

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 738, ch. 527, § 8
June 4, 1952, 66 Stat. 100, ch. 365, § 2
Aug. 5, 1963, 77 Stat. 119, Pub. L. 88-89, § 3
Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 771, Pub. L. 88-243, § 8
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 201(e), 54 DCR 903

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1218.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1008.
1973 Ed., § 40-708.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-279, in the second sentence, deleted the phrase “to the representative of the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia in the office of the Director” following “prescribed fee”; and in the penultimate sentence, substituted “and in the Department’s records” for “and on the said card opposite the entry of the information relative to the assignment”.